Utah statutes.
70A-2a-106.   Limitation on power of parties to consumer lease to choose
applicable law and judicial forum.
(1)  If the law chosen by the parties to a consumer lease is that of a
jurisdiction other than a jurisdiction in which the lessee resides at the time
the lease agreement becomes enforceable or within 30 days thereafter or in
which the goods are to be used or if the goods are to be used in more than one
jurisdiction none of which is the residence of the lessee in which the lease
is executed by the lessee, the choice is not enforceable.
(2)  If the judicial forum chosen by the parties to a consumer lease is a
forum that would not otherwise have jurisdiction over the lessee, the choice
is not enforceable.
